District of Columbia statutes.
20-344

Right of heir or legatee.

In the event a foreign personal representative fails to transfer the title to real or leasehold property located in the District of Columbia to the person or persons legally entitled to such property, within a reasonable time, the Court may direct the transfer of title to such person or persons if: (a) the will, if any, or a copy authenticated pursuant to 28 U.S.C. sec. 1738 , is filed in the Register’s office; (b) notice, approved by the Court, has been published indicating that the decedent died owning the real or leasehold property; and (c) all claims of creditors, if any, have been satisfied.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-344.